th: ปัจจัยรูปแบบโทรศัพท์มือถือ: บาร์; หุ่นจำลอง/จอแสดงผล; ฝาพับ; แบบพับได้; แบบขรุขระ; ระบบจานดาวเทียม; แถบสไลด์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato do celular: Barra; Dummy/display; Flip; Dobrável; Áspero; Satélite; Controle deslizante; Outro
hr-HR: Faktor oblika mobilnog telefona: Ručka; Model/zaslon; Preklopna; Sklopivo; Hrapava; Satelit; S klizačem; Ostalo
pt-PT: Fator de forma do telemóvel: Barra; Manequim/exposição; Flip; Dobrável; Robusto; Satélite; Deslizante; Outro
tr: Cep telefonu form faktörü: Bar tipi; Maket/ekran; Çevirme; Katlanabilir; Sağlam; Uydu; Kaydırıcı; Diğer
ja: 携帯電話のフォームファクター: バー; ダミー/ディスプレイ; フリップ; 折りたたみ式; 丈夫な; サテライト; スライダー; その他
fr: Facteur de forme du téléphone portable: Bar; Mannequin/affichage; À clapet; Pliable; Robuste; Satellite; Curseur; Autre
ru: Форм-фактор мобильного телефона: Моноблок; Муляж; Раскладушка; Складной; Защищенный; Спутниковый; Слайдер; Другой
ko: 휴대폰 폼 팩터: 바; 더미/디스플레이; 플립; 접이식; 튼튼한; 위성; 슬라이더; 기타
bg-BG: Форм-фактор на мобилен телефон: Греда; Манекен/дисплей; Флип; Сгъваем; Устойчив; Сателит; Плъзгач; Други
cs: Tvar mobilního telefonu: Klasický tlačítkový; Maketa/ukázkový; Véčko; Skládací; Odolný; Satelitní; Vysouvací; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika mobilnega telefona: Ročaj palica; Prikazni/demonstracijski model; Flip; Zložljiv; Robustna; Satelit; Drsnik; Drugo
zh-CN: 手机外形: 直板式; 模型/展示机; 翻盖式; 折叠式; 三防型; 卫星通信型; 滑盖式; 其他
ro-RO: Factor de formă pentru telefonul mobil: Bară; De prezentare/afișaj; Flip; Pliabilă; Aspră; Satelit; Glisor; Altele
da: Mobiltelefonens formfaktor: Stang; Dummy/display; Flip; Sammenfoldelig; Robust; Satellit; Skyder; Andet
fi: Matkapuhelimen muotoilu: Tanko; Dummy/näyttö; Käännettävä; Taitettava; Kestävä; Satelliitti; Liukusäädin; Muu
zh-TW: 手機外型設計: 條狀; 模型機/展示機; 翻折式; 折疊式; 耐用; 衛星; 滑桿; 其他
it: Fattore di forma del telefono cellulare: Barra; Dummy/display; Flip; Pieghevole; A coste; Satellitare; Dispositivo di scorrimento; Altro
hu: Mobiltelefon-formátum: Bar; Mintadarab/Kiállítási darab; Kinyitható; Összehajtható; Egyenetlen; Műhold; Csúszka; Egyéb
lt-LT: Mobiliojo telefono formos faktorius: Takas; Pavyzdinis / eksponuojamas; Atlenkiamas; Sulankstomas; Grubus; Palydovinė; Slankiklis; Kita
en: Mobile phone form factor: Bar; Dummy/display; Flip; Foldable; Rugged; Satellite; Slider; Other
vi: Yếu tố kiểu dáng của điện thoại di động: Khối chữ nhật; Mô hình/Trưng bày; Lật; Gập; Siêu bền; Vệ tinh; Trượt; Khác
de: Formfaktor des Mobiltelefons: Bar; Dummy/Display; Flip; Klappbar; Robust; Satellit; Schieberegler; Sonstiges
sv: Mobiltelefonens formfaktor: Stång; Dummy/display; Flip; Vikbar; Ruggad; Satellit; Skjutreglage; Övrigt
nb: Mobiltelefonens formfaktor: Bar; Dummy/display; Flipp; Sammenleggbar; Robust; Satellitt; Skyvebryter; Annet
sk-SK: Formát mobilného telefónu: Bar; Maketa/displejový model; Skladacie puzdro; Sklopný; Robustný; Satelit; Posuvník; Iné
el: Συντελεστής μορφής κινητού τηλεφώνου: Κλασικής σχεδίασης; Ομοίωμα/επίδειξης; Σπαστό; Αναδιπλούμενο; Ανθεκτικό; Δορυφορικό; Slider; Άλλο
es: Factor de forma del teléfono móvil: Barra; Maniquí/pantalla; Empuñadura; Plegable; Robusto; Satélite; Deslizador; Otros
pl: Kształt telefonu komórkowego: Belka; Atrapa/wyświetlacz; Klapka; Składany; Sztywny; Satelita; Suwak; Inne
nl: Vormfactor van mobiele telefoons: Bar; Dummy/display; Flip; Opvouwbaar; Robuust; Satelliet; Schuifregelaar; Andere